Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1823
Authority; powers over project.

The authority may determine the location and character of any project to be financed or refinanced under the Nebraska Elementary and Secondary School Finance Authority Act and construct, reconstruct, remodel, renovate, replace, maintain, repair, operate, lease as lessee or lessor, and regulate the same. The authority may also enter into contracts for any or all of such purposes, enter into contracts for the management and operation of a project, and designate an elementary or secondary school as its agent to determine the location and character of a project undertaken by an elementary or secondary school under the act and as the agent of the authority, to construct, reconstruct, remodel, renovate, replace, maintain, repair, operate, lease as lessee or lessor, and regulate the same and, as the agent of the authority, to enter into contracts for any or all of such purposes, including contracts for the management and operation of such project.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 23.